uz_UZ.aff
SFX J Y 80
SFX J 0 dir .
SFX J 0 dirki .
SFX J 0 dir-ov .
SFX J 0 dir-u .
SFX J 0 diram .
SFX J 0 dirman .
SFX J 0 dirmanki .
SFX J 0 dirman-ov .
SFX J 0 dirman-u .
SFX J 0 dirmanam .
SFX J 0 dirmiz .
SFX J 0 dirmizki .
SFX J 0 dirmiz-ov .
SFX J 0 dirmiz-u .
SFX J 0 dirmizam .
SFX J 0 dirsan .
SFX J 0 dirsanki .
SFX J 0 dirsan-ov .
SFX J 0 dirsan-u .
SFX J 0 dirsanam .
SFX J 0 dirsiz .
SFX J 0 dirsizki .
SFX J 0 dirsiz-ov .
SFX J 0 dirsiz-u .
SFX J 0 dirsizam .
SFX J 0 dirsanlar .
SFX J 0 dirsanlarki .
SFX J 0 dirsanlar-ov .
SFX J 0 dirsanlar-u .
SFX J 0 dirsanlaram .
SFX J 0 dirsizlar .
SFX J 0 dirsizlarki .
SFX J 0 dirsizlar-ov .
SFX J 0 dirsizlar-u .
SFX J 0 dirsizlaram .
SFX J 0 dirlar .
SFX J 0 dirlarki .
SFX J 0 dirlar-ov .
SFX J 0 dirlar-u .
SFX J 0 dirlaram .
SFX J 0 masdir .
SFX J 0 masdirki .
SFX J 0 masdir-ov .
SFX J 0 masdir-u .
SFX J 0 masdiram .
SFX J 0 masdirman .
SFX J 0 masdirmanki .
SFX J 0 masdirman-ov .
SFX J 0 masdirman-u .
SFX J 0 masdirmanam .
SFX J 0 masdirmiz .
SFX J 0 masdirmizki .
SFX J 0 masdirmiz-ov .
SFX J 0 masdirmiz-u .
SFX J 0 masdirmizam .
SFX J 0 masdirsan .
SFX J 0 masdirsanki .
SFX J 0 masdirsan-ov .
SFX J 0 masdirsan-u .
SFX J 0 masdirsanam .
SFX J 0 masdirsiz .
SFX J 0 masdirsizki .
SFX J 0 masdirsiz-ov .
SFX J 0 masdirsiz-u .
SFX J 0 masdirsizam .
SFX J 0 masdirsanlar .
SFX J 0 masdirsanlarki .
SFX J 0 masdirsanlar-ov .
SFX J 0 masdirsanlar-u .
SFX J 0 masdirsanlaram .
SFX J 0 masdirsizlar .
SFX J 0 masdirsizlarki .
SFX J 0 masdirsizlar-ov .
SFX J 0 masdirsizlar-u .
SFX J 0 masdirsizlaram .
SFX J 0 masdirlar .
SFX J 0 masdirlarki .
SFX J 0 masdirlar-ov .
SFX J 0 masdirlar-u .
SFX J 0 masdirlaram .

SFX K Y 32
SFX K 0 mikan .
SFX K 0 mikanki .
SFX K 0 mikanman .
SFX K 0 mikanmanki .
SFX K 0 mikanmiz .
SFX K 0 mikanmizki .
SFX K 0 mikansan .
SFX K 0 mikansanki .
SFX K 0 mikansiz .
SFX K 0 mikansizki .
SFX K 0 mikansanlar .
SFX K 0 mikansanlarki .
SFX K 0 mikansizlar .
SFX K 0 mikansizlarki .
SFX K 0 mikanlar .
SFX K 0 mikanlarki .
SFX K 0 masmikan .
SFX K 0 masmikanki .
SFX K 0 masmikanman .
SFX K 0 masmikanmanki .
SFX K 0 masmikanmiz .
SFX K 0 masmikanmizki .
SFX K 0 masmikansan .
SFX K 0 masmikansanki .
SFX K 0 masmikansiz .
SFX K 0 masmikansizki .
SFX K 0 masmikansanlar .
SFX K 0 masmikansanlarki .
SFX K 0 masmikansizlar .
SFX K 0 masmikansizlarki .
SFX K 0 masmikanlar .
SFX K 0 masmikanlarki .

SFX L Y 30
SFX L 0 misan .
SFX L 0 misanki .
SFX L 0 misan-u .
SFX L 0 misiz .
SFX L 0 misizki .
SFX L 0 misiz-u .
SFX L 0 misanlar .
SFX L 0 misanlarki .
SFX L 0 misanlar-u .
SFX L 0 misizlar .
SFX L 0 misizlarki .
SFX L 0 misizlar-u .
SFX L 0 milar .
SFX L 0 milarki .
SFX L 0 milar-u .
SFX L 0 masmisan .
SFX L 0 masmisanki .
SFX L 0 masmisan-u .
SFX L 0 masmisiz .
SFX L 0 masmisizki .
SFX L 0 masmisiz-u .
SFX L 0 masmisanlar .
SFX L 0 masmisanlarki .
SFX L 0 masmisanlar-u .
SFX L 0 masmisizlar .
SFX L 0 masmisizlarki .
SFX L 0 masmisizlar-u .
SFX L 0 masmilar .
SFX L 0 masmilarki .
SFX L 0 masmilar-u .

SFX M Y 210
SFX M 0 ligim .
SFX M 0 ligimki .
SFX M 0 ligimmi .
SFX M 0 ligim-ku .
SFX M 0 ligim-chi .
SFX M 0 ligim-da .
SFX M 0 ligim-ov .
SFX M 0 ligimdir .
SFX M 0 ligimdir-da .
SFX M 0 ligimmikan .
SFX M 0 ligim-u .
SFX M 0 ligimam .
SFX M 0 ligimoq .
SFX M 0 ligimiz .
SFX M 0 ligimizki .
SFX M 0 ligimizmi .
SFX M 0 ligimiz-ku .
SFX M 0 ligimiz-chi .
SFX M 0 ligimiz-da .
SFX M 0 ligimiz-ov .
SFX M 0 ligimizdir .
SFX M 0 ligimizdir-da .
SFX M 0 ligimizmikan .
SFX M 0 ligimiz-u .
SFX M 0 ligimizam .
SFX M 0 ligimizoq .
SFX M 0 liging .
SFX M 0 ligingki .
SFX M 0 ligingmi .
SFX M 0 liging-ku .
SFX M 0 liging-chi .
SFX M 0 liging-da .
SFX M 0 liging-ov .
SFX M 0 ligingdir .
SFX M 0 ligingdir-da .
SFX M 0 ligingmikan .
SFX M 0 liging-u .
SFX M 0 ligingam .
SFX M 0 ligingoq .
SFX M 0 ligingiz .
SFX M 0 ligingizki .
SFX M 0 ligingizmi .
SFX M 0 ligingiz-ku .
SFX M 0 ligingiz-chi .
SFX M 0 ligingiz-da .
SFX M 0 ligingiz-ov .
SFX M 0 ligingizdir .
SFX M 0 ligingizdir-da .
SFX M 0 ligingizmikan .
SFX M 0 ligingiz-u .
SFX M 0 ligingizam .
SFX M 0 ligingizoq .
SFX M 0 liklaring .
SFX M 0 liklaringki .
SFX M 0 liklaringmi .
SFX M 0 liklaring-ku .
SFX M 0 liklaring-chi .
SFX M 0 liklaring-da .
SFX M 0 liklaring-ov .
SFX M 0 liklaringdir .
SFX M 0 liklaringdir-da .
SFX M 0 liklaringmikan .
SFX M 0 liklaring-u .
SFX M 0 liklaringam .
SFX M 0 liklaringoq .
SFX M 0 liklaringiz .
SFX M 0 liklaringizki .
SFX M 0 liklaringizmi .
SFX M 0 liklaringiz-ku .
SFX M 0 liklaringiz-chi .
SFX M 0 liklaringiz-da .
SFX M 0 liklaringiz-ov .
SFX M 0 liklaringizdir .
SFX M 0 liklaringizdir-da .
SFX M 0 liklaringizmikan .
SFX M 0 liklaringiz-u .
SFX M 0 liklaringizam .
SFX M 0 liklaringizoq .
SFX M 0 ligi .
SFX M 0 ligiki .
SFX M 0 ligimi .
SFX M 0 ligi-ku .
SFX M 0 ligi-chi .
SFX M 0 ligi-da .
SFX M 0 ligi-ov .
SFX M 0 ligidir .
SFX M 0 ligidir-da .
SFX M 0 ligimikan .
SFX M 0 ligi-yu .
SFX M 0 ligiyam .
SFX M 0 ligiyoq .
SFX M 0 liklari .
SFX M 0 liklariki .
SFX M 0 liklarimi .
SFX M 0 liklari-ku .
SFX M 0 liklari-chi .
SFX M 0 liklari-da .
SFX M 0 liklari-ov .
SFX M 0 liklaridir .
SFX M 0 liklaridir-da .
SFX M 0 liklarimikan .
SFX M 0 liklari-yu .
SFX M 0 liklariyam .
SFX M 0 liklariyoq .
SFX M 0 masligim .
SFX M 0 masligimki .
SFX M 0 masligimmi .
SFX M 0 masligim-ku .
SFX M 0 masligim-chi .
SFX M 0 masligim-da .
SFX M 0 masligim-ov .
SFX M 0 masligimdir .
SFX M 0 masligimdir-da .
SFX M 0 masligimmikan .
SFX M 0 masligim-u .
SFX M 0 masligimam .
SFX M 0 masligimoq .
SFX M 0 masligimiz .
SFX M 0 masligimizki .
SFX M 0 masligimizmi .
SFX M 0 masligimiz-ku .
SFX M 0 masligimiz-chi .
SFX M 0 masligimiz-da .
SFX M 0 masligimiz-ov .
SFX M 0 masligimizdir .
SFX M 0 masligimizdir-da .
SFX M 0 masligimizmikan .
SFX M 0 masligimiz-u .
SFX M 0 masligimizam .
SFX M 0 masligimizoq .
SFX M 0 masliging .
SFX M 0 masligingki .
SFX M 0 masligingmi .
SFX M 0 masliging-ku .
SFX M 0 masliging-chi .
SFX M 0 masliging-da .
SFX M 0 masliging-ov .
SFX M 0 masligingdir .
SFX M 0 masligingdir-da .
SFX M 0 masligingmikan .
SFX M 0 masliging-u .
SFX M 0 masligingam .
SFX M 0 masligingoq .
SFX M 0 masligingiz .
SFX M 0 masligingizki .
SFX M 0 masligingizmi .
SFX M 0 masligingiz-ku .
SFX M 0 masligingiz-chi .
SFX M 0 masligingiz-da .
SFX M 0 masligingiz-ov .
SFX M 0 masligingizdir .
SFX M 0 masligingizdir-da .
SFX M 0 masligingizmikan .
SFX M 0 masligingiz-u .
SFX M 0 masligingizam .
SFX M 0 masligingizoq .
SFX M 0 masliklaring .
SFX M 0 masliklaringki .
SFX M 0 masliklaringmi .
SFX M 0 masliklaring-ku .
SFX M 0 masliklaring-chi .
SFX M 0 masliklaring-da .
SFX M 0 masliklaring-ov .
SFX M 0 masliklaringdir .
SFX M 0 masliklaringdir-da .
SFX M 0 masliklaringmikan .
SFX M 0 masliklaring-u .
SFX M 0 masliklaringam .
SFX M 0 masliklaringoq .
SFX M 0 masliklaringiz .
SFX M 0 masliklaringizki .
SFX M 0 masliklaringizmi .
SFX M 0 masliklaringiz-ku .
SFX M 0 masliklaringiz-chi .
SFX M 0 masliklaringiz-da .
SFX M 0 masliklaringiz-ov .
SFX M 0 masliklaringizdir .
SFX M 0 masliklaringizdir-da .
SFX M 0 masliklaringizmikan .
SFX M 0 masliklaringiz-u .
SFX M 0 masliklaringizam .
SFX M 0 masliklaringizoq .
SFX M 0 masligi .
SFX M 0 masligiki .
SFX M 0 masligimi .
SFX M 0 masligi-ku .
SFX M 0 masligi-chi .
SFX M 0 masligi-da .
SFX M 0 masligi-ov .
SFX M 0 masligidir .
SFX M 0 masligidir-da .
SFX M 0 masligimikan .
SFX M 0 masligi-yu .
SFX M 0 masligiyam .
SFX M 0 masligiyoq .
SFX M 0 masliklari .
SFX M 0 masliklariki .
SFX M 0 masliklarimi .
SFX M 0 masliklari-ku .
SFX M 0 masliklari-chi .
SFX M 0 masliklari-da .
SFX M 0 masliklari-ov .
SFX M 0 masliklaridir .
SFX M 0 masliklaridir-da .
SFX M 0 masliklarimikan .
SFX M 0 masliklari-yu .
SFX M 0 masliklariyam .
SFX M 0 masliklariyoq .
SFX M 0 oq [^aeiou]
SFX M 0 yoq [aeiou]
